Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6826
Qualified employee leasing company; employees; duty.

An employee of a qualified employee leasing company shall be considered to be an employee of the client-lessee for purposes of the ImagiNE Nebraska Act if the employee performs services for the client-lessee. A qualified employee leasing company shall provide the Department of Revenue with access to the records of employees leased to the client-lessee.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 26.